norm/degem.regex
! Degemination: Doppelkonsonant nach Vokal → einfacher Konsonant.
define Vowel [a|e|i|o|u|ā|ē|ī|ō|ū];

define DegemNN [n (->) 0 || Vowel _ n];
define DegemMM [m (->) 0 || Vowel _ m];
define DegemPP [p (->) 0 || Vowel _ p];
define DegemTT [t (->) 0 || Vowel _ t];
define DegemDD [d (->) 0 || Vowel _ d];
define DegemKK [k (->) 0 || Vowel _ k];
define DegemLL [l (->) 0 || Vowel _ l];
define DegemRR [r (->) 0 || Vowel _ r];
define DegemSS [s (->) 0 || Vowel _ s];
define DegemBB [b (->) 0 || Vowel _ b];
define DegemGG [g (->) 0 || Vowel _ g];
define DegemZZ [z (->) 0 || Vowel _ z];

regex DegemNN .o. DegemMM .o. DegemPP .o. DegemTT .o. DegemDD .o. DegemKK .o. DegemLL .o. DegemRR .o. DegemSS .o. DegemBB .o. DegemGG .o. DegemZZ ;
save stack build/norm-degem.hfst
quit
